hu: Dohány vágási típusa: Cake; Morzsolt; Kockára vágott; Finomra vágott; Pelyhes (flake); Granulált; Préselt (plug); Szálkás vágatú; Sodródohány (shag); Egész leveles; Egyéb
fi: Tupakan leikkuutyyppi: Kakku; Crumble; Kuutioksi leikattu; Hienoksi leikattu; Hiutale; Rakeistettu; Puriste; Nauhaksi leikattu; Shag-leikattu; Kokonainen lehti; Muu
bg-BG: Тип нарязване на тютюна: Пресован (Cake); Натрошен; Нарязан на кубчета; Фино нарязан; На люспи (Флейк); Гранулиран; Плаг (Plug); Нарязан на ленти; Шаг (Shag); Цяло листо; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta kroja tobaka: Stisnjen; Drobljen; Rez na kocke; Fini rez; Kosmiči (flake); Granuliran; Plug (čep); Tračni rez; Rez shag; Cel list; Drugo
nl: Snijwijze tabak: Cake; Crumble; Blokjessnit; Fijnsneden; Flake; Gekorreld; Plug; Ribbon-snit; Shag; Heel blad; Overige
lt-LT: Tabako smulkinimo tipas: Briketais; Trupinamas; Kubeliais; Smulkaus pjaustymo; Dribsniais; Granuliuotas; Presuotas (Plug); Juostelėmis; Smulkintas gijomis; Sveikų lapų; Kita
zh-TW: 菸草切絲類型: 餅狀; 碎狀; 丁狀; 細切; 片狀; 顆粒狀; 塊狀; 絲狀; 蓬鬆狀; 全葉; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de tăietură a tutunului: Cake; Crumble; Tăietură cubică; Tăietură fină; Flake; Granulat; Plug; Tăietură tip panglică; Shag; Frunză întreagă; Altele
es: Tipo de corte de tabaco: En bloque; Desmenuzado; Corte en cubos; Corte fino; En hojuelas; Granulado; Plug; Corte en cinta; Hebra fina (shag); Hoja entera; Otro
pl: Typ cięcia tytoniu: Ciastko (Cake); Kruszony (Crumble); W kostkach (Cube cut); Drobno krojony (Fine cut); W płatkach (Flake); Granulowany; Kostka prasowana (Plug); Wstążka (Ribbon cut); Shag; Cały liść; Inny
el: Τύπος κοπής καπνού: Πλακίδιο (cake); Θρυμματισμένο (crumble); Σε κύβους (cube cut); Ψιλοκομμένο (fine cut); Νιφάδες (flake); Κοκκώδες (granulated); Συμπιεσμένο (plug); Σε λωρίδες (ribbon cut); Πολύ ψιλοκομμένο (shag); Ολόκληρο φύλλο; Άλλο
th: ประเภทการตัดยาสูบ: แบบเค้ก; แบบร่วน; แบบลูกเต๋า; แบบเส้นเล็ก; แบบแผ่นบาง; แบบเม็ด; แบบอัดก้อน; แบบเส้นยาว; แบบเส้นฝอย; แบบเต็มใบ; อื่นๆ
da: Type af tobaksskæring: Kage; Crumble; Terningeskåret; Finskåret; Flage; Granuleret; Plug; Båndskåret; Shag; Hele blade; Andet
sv: Typ av tobaksskärning: Cake; Crumble; Kubskuren; Finskuren; Flake; Granulerad; Plug; Bandsnitt; Shag; Hela blad; Övrigt
tr: Tütün kesim tipi: Kek; Kırıntı; Küp kesim; İnce kesim; Pul kesim; Granül; Preslenmiş (Plug); Şerit kesim; İnce saçak (Shag); Bütün yaprak; Diğer
zh-CN: 烟草切割类型: 烟饼; 碎烟; 方块切条; 细切条; 烟片; 颗粒状; 压块; 带状切条; 细丝; 全叶; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de corte do tabaco: Cake; Crumble; Corte em cubo; Corte fino; Flake; Granulado; Plug; Corte em fita; Shag; Folha inteira; Outros
ru: Тип нарезки табака: Брикет; Крамбл; Кубиками; Тонкая нарезка; Флейк; Гранулированный; Плаг; Ленточная нарезка; Шэг; Цельный лист; Другое
sk-SK: Typ tabakového rezu: Cake; Crumble; Kockový rez; Jemný rez; Flake; Granulovaný; Plug; Prúžkový rez; Shag; Celý list; Iné
de: Schnittart des Tabaks: Cake; Crumble; Cube Cut; Feinschnitt; Flake; Granuliert; Plug; Ribbon Cut; Shag; Ganzes Blatt; Sonstige
ja: タバコカットタイプ: ケーキ; クランブル; キューブカット; ファインカット; フレーク; グラニュレーテッド; プラグ; リボンカット; シャグ; ホールリーフ; その他
cs: Typ řezu tabáku: Cake; Crumble; Cube cut; Jemný řez; Flake; Granulovaný; Plug; Ribbon cut; Shag; Celé listy; Jiné
fr: Type de coupe du tabac: Cake; Crumble; Coupe cubique; Coupe fine; Flake; Granulé; Plug; Coupe ruban; Shag; Feuille entière; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta rezanja duhana: Prešano (cake); Mljeveno (crumble); Rez na kockice; Fino rezani; U listićima (flake); Granulirani; Prešani blok (plug); Rez na trakice; Vlaknasti rez (shag); Cijeli list; Ostalo
nb: Type snitt for tobakk: Kake; Smuldret; Terningkuttet; Finkuttet; Flake; Granulert; Plug; Båndkuttet; Shag; Hele blader; Annet
it: Tipo di taglio del tabacco: Cake; Crumble; Taglio a cubetti; Taglio fine; Flake; Granulato; Plug; Taglio a nastro (ribbon); Shag; Foglia intera; Altro
ko: 담배 잎 재단 형태: 케이크; 크럼블; 큐브 컷; 파인 컷; 플레이크; 그래뉼레이트; 플러그; 리본 컷; 섀그; 통잎; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de corte do tabaco: Bolo; Esfarelado; Corte em cubo; Corte fino; Floco; Granulado; Bujão; Corte em fita; Fio fino; Folha inteira; Outro
en: Tobacco cut type: Cake; Crumble; Cube cut; Fine cut; Flake; Granulated; Plug; Ribbon cut; Shag; Whole leaf; Other
vi: Kiểu cắt sợi thuốc lá: Dạng bánh; Dạng vụn; Cắt khối; Cắt mịn; Dạng vảy; Dạng hạt; Dạng nút; Cắt ruy-băng; Cắt sợi nhỏ (Shag); Lá nguyên; Khác